Massachusetts, session 194th, H5291.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 25A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:
Section 22.
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department shall
ensure equity, accessibility, and promote participation by renters and low-income retail electric
customers in the solar incentive program established in section 11 of chapter 75 of the acts of
2016, and in any successor solar incentive program.
(b) For the purposes of any such solar incentive program, a low-income multi-residential
building shall qualify as one Low Income Customer if such building:
(i) meets the definition of low or moderate income housing pursuant to chapter 40B,
section 20; or
of 2

(ii) receives an allocation of federal low-income housing tax credits pursuant to section
42 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) A building qualifying under subsection (b) shall be treated as a single Low Income
Customer without regard to the number of dwelling units, utility meters, or accounts located
therein, and electric distribution companies shall administer billing credits, incentive eligibility,
and capacity allocations consistent with this section.
of 2